Utah statutes.
31A-34-107.   Directors, trustees, and officers.

(1)  To ensure representation of consumer interests, at least 25% of the board shall be enrollees, chosen under a plan proposed by the alliance and approved by the commissioner.

(2)  Those who sit as directors or trustees on the board or as officers or principals of the corporation or trust shall be trustworthy and collectively have the competence and experience to carry out the activities of the alliance.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

